en: Alternator regulator type: External regulator required; Internal regulator; PCM/ECU controlled (smart charging); Self-exciting (one-wire); Other
vi: Loại bộ điều chỉnh điện áp máy phát điện: Yêu cầu bộ điều chỉnh điện áp ngoài; Bộ điều chỉnh điện áp trong; Được điều khiển bằng PCM/ECU (sạc thông minh); Tự kích (một dây); Khác
lt-LT: Alternatoriaus reguliatoriaus tipas: Reikalingas išorinis reguliatorius; Vidinis reguliatorius; Valdomas PCM / ECU (išmanusis įkrovimas); Su savosios žadinimo apvija (vienalaidis); Kita
nb: Dynamoregulatortype: Ekstern regulator kreves; Intern regulator; PCM-/ECU-kontrollert (smartlading); Selvmagnetiserende (én ledning); Annet
zh-CN: 交流发电机稳压器类型: 需要外置调节器; 内置调节器; PCM/ECU 控制（智能充电）; 自励式（单线）; 其他
nl: Type dynamoregelaar: Externe regelaar vereist; Interne regelaar; PCM/ECU-gestuurd (slim laden); Zelfbekrachtigend (eendraads); Overig
ro-RO: Tipul regulatorului alternatorului: Necesită regulator extern; Regulator intern; Controlat de PCM/ECU (încărcare inteligentă); Auto-excitare (un singur fir); Altele
sk-SK: Typ regulátora alternátora: Vyžaduje sa externý regulátor; Interný regulátor; Riadené PCM/ECU (inteligentné nabíjanie); Samobudiaci (jednovodičový); Iný
sv: Typ av generatorregulator: Extern regulator krävs; Intern regulator; PCM-/ECU-styrd (smart laddning); Självmagnetiserande (enledare); Annan
ru: Тип регулятора генератора: Требуется внешний регулятор; Внутренний регулятор; Управление PCM/ЭБУ (интеллектуальная зарядка); С самовозбуждением (однопроводной); Другое
hu: Generátor szabályozójának típusa: Külső feszültségszabályzó szükséges; Beépített feszültségszabályzó; PCM/ECU vezérelt (okos töltés); Öngerjesztő (egyvezetékes); Egyéb
da: Generatorregulatortype: Ekstern regulator påkrævet; Intern regulator; PCM/ECU-styret (smart-opladning); Selvmagnetiserende (ettråds); Andet
pt-PT: Tipo de regulador do alternador: Requer regulador externo; Regulador interno; Controlado por PCM/ECU (carregamento inteligente); Autoexcitável (um fio); Outro
sl-SI: Tip regulatorja alternatorja: Potreben je zunanji regulator; Notranji regulator; Krmili PCM/ECU (pametno polnjenje); Samovzbujalni (enožični); Drugo
it: Tipo di regolatore dell'alternatore: Regolatore esterno richiesto; Regolatore interno; Controllato da PCM/ECU (ricarica intelligente); Autoeccitante (un filo); Altro
es: Tipo de regulador del alternador: Requiere regulador externo; Regulador interno; Controlado por PCM/ECU (carga inteligente); Autoexcitable (un cable); Otro
el: Τύπος ρυθμιστή εναλλάκτη: Απαιτείται εξωτερικός ρυθμιστής; Εσωτερικός ρυθμιστής; Ελεγχόμενος από PCM/ECU (έξυπνη φόρτιση); Αυτοδιεγειρόμενος (ενός καλωδίου); Άλλο
pt-BR: Tipo de regulador do alternador: Necessário regulador externo; Regulador interno; Controlado por PCM/ECU (carregamento inteligente); Autoexcitável (um fio); Outro
hr-HR: Vrsta regulatora alternatora: Potreban je vanjski regulator; Unutarnji regulator; Kontrolirano putem PCM/ECU-a (pametno punjenje); Samouzbudno (jedna žica); Ostalo
fr: Type de régulateur d’alternateur: Régulateur externe requis; Régulateur interne; Contrôlé par PCM/ECU (charge intelligente); Auto-excitateur (un fil); Autre
de: Typ des Lichtmaschinenreglers: Externer Regler erforderlich; Interner Regler; PCM/ECU-gesteuert (Smart Charging); Selbsterregend (Ein-Draht); Sonstige
pl: Typ regulatora alternatora: Wymagany zewnętrzny regulator; Wewnętrzny regulator; Sterowany przez PCM/ECU (inteligentne ładowanie); Samowzbudny (jednoprzewodowy); Inny
bg-BG: Тип регулатор на алтернатора: Изисква се външен регулатор; Вътрешен регулатор; PCM/ECU управление (интелигентно зареждане); Самобуден (еднопроводен); Друго
tr: Alternatör regülatör tipi: Harici regülatör gereklidir; Dahili regülatör; PCM/ECU kontrollü (akıllı şarj); Kendinden uyarmalı (tek telli); Diğer
ko: 교류 발전기 조절기 유형: 외부 레귤레이터 필요; 내부 레귤레이터; PCM/ECU 제어형(스마트 충전); 자여자(1선식); 기타
fi: Vaihtovirtageneraattorin säätimen tyyppi: Vaatii ulkoisen säätimen; Sisäinen säädin; PCM-/ECU-ohjattu (älykäs lataus); Itseherätteinen (yksijohtiminen); Muu
ja: オルタネーターレギュレータータイプ: 外部レギュレーターが必要; 内部レギュレーター; PCM/ECU制御 (スマートチャージ); 自己励磁 (1ワイヤー); その他
cs: Typ regulátoru alternátoru: Vyžaduje externí regulátor; Interní regulátor; Řízeno PCM/ECU (chytré nabíjení); Samobudící (jednovodičové); Jiné
th: ประเภทตัวควบคุมแรงดันไฟฟ้าของไดชาร์จ: ต้องใช้เรกูเลเตอร์ภายนอก; เรกูเลเตอร์ภายใน; ควบคุมด้วย PCM/ECU (การชาร์จอัจฉริยะ); กระตุ้นตัวเอง (สายเดี่ยว); อื่นๆ
zh-TW: 交流發電機調節器類型: 需外置調節器; 內置調節器; PCM/ECU 控制 (智慧充電); 自激式 (單線); 其他